Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 16 Starting, Stopping, and Turns

31-16-1.
Care in starting from stop.

No person shall start a vehicle which is stopped, standing, or parked unless and until the movement can be made with reasonable safety. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-1

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-2.
Manner of turning at intersection.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn at an intersection shall do so as follows:

Right turns.

Both the approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

Pedestrians intending to cross a lane of traffic which is required to stop or yield by a red traffic light, stop or yield sign or other traffic control device shall be granted the right-of-way.

Left turns on two-way roadways.

At any intersection where traffic is permitted to move in both directions on each roadway entering the intersections, an approach for a left turn shall be made in that portion of the right half of the roadway nearest the center line of it and by passing to the right of the center line where it enters the intersection, and, after entering the intersection, the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection to the right of the center line of the roadway being entered. Whenever practicable the left turn shall be made in that portion of the intersection to the left of the center of the intersection.

Pedestrians intending to cross a lane of traffic which is required to stop or yield by a red traffic light, stop or yield sign or other traffic control device shall be granted the right of way.

Left turns on other than two way roadways.

At any intersection where traffic is restricted to one direction on one or more of the roadways, the driver of a vehicle intending to turn left at an intersection shall approach the intersection in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of the vehicle, and, after entering the intersection, the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection, as nearly as practicable, in the left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction upon the roadway being entered.

Pedestrians intending to cross a lane of traffic which is required to stop or yield by a red traffic light, stop or yield sign, or other traffic control device, shall be granted the right-of-way.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-2

; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-3.
Marking of turn-paths at particular intersections.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may place markers, buttons, or signs within or adjacent to intersections, and require and direct that a different course from that specified in §

31-16-2

be traveled by vehicles turning at an intersection, and when markers, buttons, or signs are so placed, no driver of a vehicle shall turn a vehicle at an intersection other than as directed and required by the markers, buttons, or signs.

In view of the fact that there are many intersections, including “T” intersections, where large numbers of vehicles turn left, local authorities and traffic officers should permit and direct vehicles to turn left in two (2) lines at those intersections.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-3

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-4.
Places where U-turns prohibited.

No vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve or upon the approach to, or near the crest of a grade, where the vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred feet (500´). Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-4

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-5.
Turn signal required.

No person shall turn a vehicle at an intersection unless the vehicle is in proper position upon the roadway as required in §§

31-16-2

and

31-16-3

, or turn a vehicle to enter a private road or driveway, or otherwise turn a vehicle from a direct course or move right or left upon a roadway, unless and until the movement can be made with reasonable safety. No person shall so turn any vehicle without giving an appropriate signal in the manner described in this chapter in the event any other traffic may be affected by the movement. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-5

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-6.
Time of signaling turn.

A signal of intention to turn right or left when required shall be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred feet (100´) traveled by the vehicle before turning. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-6

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-6.1.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of §

31-16-2

pertaining to the right-of-way of pedestrians, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than seventy-five ($75.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 64.

31-16-7.
Signaling of stops.

No person shall stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner described in this chapter to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give the signal. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-7

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-8.
Method of giving signals.

Any stop or turn signal when required in this chapter shall be given either by means of the hand and arm or by a signal lamp or lamps or mechanical signal device, except as otherwise provided in §

31-16-9

. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3500, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 111.

31-16-9.
Vehicles on which mechanical signal devices required.

Any motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with, and required signal shall be given by, a signal lamp or lamps or mechanical signal device when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of the motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four inches (24"), or when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load of it exceeds fourteen feet (14´). The latter measurement shall apply to any single vehicle, and/or to any combination of vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3500, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-9

.

31-16-10.
Manner of giving arm signals.

All signals required in this chapter when given by hand and arm shall be given from the left side of the vehicle in the following manner and the signals shall indicate as follows:

Left turn. Hand and arm extended horizontally;

Right turn. Hand and arm extended upward;

Stop or decrease speed. Hand and arm extended downward.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 27, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-16-10

.